Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-158
Banks; appointment as personal representative or special administrator; authorized.

Any bank may be appointed and shall have power to act, either by itself or jointly with any natural person or persons, as personal representative of the estate of any deceased person or as special administrator of the estate of any deceased person under the appointment of a court of record having jurisdiction of the estate of such deceased person. When a bank is so appointed and an oath is required to be made, whether in order to qualify or for any other purpose, the president, vice president, or secretary of the bank may, on behalf of the bank, make and subscribe to the required oath.

Laws 1959, c. 18, § 1, p. 142;

Laws 1961, c. 14, § 3, p. 107;

Laws 1961, c. 16, § 1, p. 116;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-1,117;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 58, p. 158;

Laws 1973, LB 164, § 17;

Laws 1986, LB 909, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 57.